District of Columbia statutes.
42-3141.10

Graffiti abatement materials.

(a)

If the Mayor provides a paint voucher to an owner to abate graffiti at a particular property, the Mayor is not required to provide another paint voucher to abate graffiti at that property for the 12-month period following the date on which the paint voucher was provided.

(b)

If the Mayor provides a graffiti clean-up kit to an owner to abate graffiti at a particular property, the Mayor is not required to provide another clean-up kit to abate graffiti at that property for the 12-month period following the date on which the kit was provided.

(c)

The Mayor may provide other types of graffiti removal materials and, by regulation, limit the extent to which they are provided to a property owner.

(d)

Nothing in this section precludes the Mayor from providing additional paint vouchers, clean-up kits, or other graffiti abatement materials for use in community anti-graffiti efforts.

Sept. 18, 2010, D.C. Law 18-219, § 11, 57 DCR 4353
This section is referenced in § 42-3141.03 and § 42-3141.11.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 11 of Anti-Graffiti Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-389, May 5, 2010, 57 DCR 4332).